Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1031.
do enact as follows:SB1031,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB1031,28Section 2. 20.235 (1) (dm) of the statutes is created to read:SB1031,2,10920.235 (1) (dm) Undergraduate assistance grant program. The amounts in 10the schedule for the undergraduate assistance grant program under s. 39.55.SB1031,311Section 3. 39.55 of the statutes is created to read:SB1031,2,151239.55 Undergraduate assistance grant program. (1) In this section, 13“institution of higher education” means a private nonprofit postsecondary 14institution that is headquartered in this state and that is accredited, as defined in s. 1539.30 (1) (d).SB1031,2,1716(2) The board shall establish and administer an undergraduate assistance 17grant program to provide financial assistance to eligible undergraduate students.SB1031,2,1918(3) (a) Subject to par. (b), a student is eligible to receive a grant under this 19section if all of the following apply:SB1031,2,21201. The student is enrolled in an undergraduate program at an institution of 21higher education.SB1031,2,23222. The student is a resident of this state, as determined according to the 23criteria for determining bona fide residence in s. 36.27 (2) (e).SB1031,3,2243. The student has completed the federal Free Application for Federal Student 1Aid, as described in 20 USC 1090 (a), for the applicable academic year and does not 2qualify for a federal Pell grant under 20 USC 1070a.SB1031,3,434. The student’s adjusted gross income, as defined in 20 USC 1070a (a) (2) (A), 4is less than $60,000.SB1031,3,95(b) The board may not award a grant under this section to a student whose 6name appears on the statewide support lien docket under s. 49.854 (2) (b), unless 7the student provides to the board a payment agreement that has been approved by 8the county child support agency under s. 59.53 (5) and that is consistent with rules 9promulgated under s. 49.858 (2) (a).SB1031,3,1110(4) (a) Subject to par. (b), from the appropriation under s. 20.235 (1) (dm), the 11board may award grants to eligible students.SB1031,3,1712(b) The board may award a grant under this section to the same student for up 13to 10 semesters of full-time enrollment or, as determined by the board, the 14equivalent of 10 semesters of full-time enrollment. If the student receiving the 15grant is enrolled less than full time in any semester or session, only the fraction of 16the student’s enrollment, in proportion to full-time enrollment, shall be applied 17toward this 10-semester limit.SB1031,3,1818